Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.080

Ordinance—Creation of district.

Every ordinance ordering a local improvement to be paid in whole or in part by assessments against the property specially benefited shall describe the improvement and establish a local improvement district to be known as "local improvement district No. . . . .," or a utility local improvement district to be known as "utility local improvement district No. . . . ." which shall embrace as nearly as practicable all the property specially benefited by the improvement.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 258 s 3; 1967 c 52 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.43.080. Prior: 1957 c 144 s 15; prior: (i) 1947 c 155 s 1, part; 1941 c 90 s 1, part; 1915 c 168 s 2, part; 1911 c 98 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9365, part. (ii) 1929 c 97 s 2; 1911 c 98 s 14; RRS s 9366.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.